pt-PT: Tipo de acionamento do interruptor da luz de travão: Eletrónico/com base em sensor; Interruptor de pressão hidráulica; Acionado por alavanca; Êmbolo mecânico (montagem no pedal); Interruptor de vácuo; Outro
nl: Type activering remlichtschakelaar: Elektronisch / op basis van sensor; Hydraulische drukschakelaar; Hendelbediend; Mechanische plunjer (pedaalgemonteerd); Vacuümschakelaar; Overig
fr: Type d'actionnement du contacteur de feux stop: Électronique/à capteur; Interrupteur de pression hydraulique; Actionné par levier; Piston mécanique (monté sur pédale); Interrupteur à vide; Autre
fi: Jarruvalokatkaisimen aktivoinnin tyyppi: Elektroninen / anturipohjainen; Hydraulinen painekytkin; Viputoiminen; Mekaaninen mäntä (polkimeen asennettava); Alipainekytkin; Muu
cs: Způsob ovládání spínače brzdových světel: Elektronické / senzorové; Hydraulický tlakový spínač; Ovládané pákou; Mechanický píst (montovaný na pedál); Podtlakový spínač; Jiné
en: Brake light switch actuation type: Electronic / sensor-based; Hydraulic pressure switch; Lever-actuated; Mechanical plunger (pedal-mounted); Vacuum switch; Other
ro-RO: Tipul de acționare al întrerupătorului luminii de frână: Electronic / pe bază de senzor; Comutator de presiune hidraulică; Acționat cu manetă; Piston mecanic (montat pe pedală); Comutator vacuumatic; Altele
bg-BG: Тип превключватели на спирачните светлини: Електронен / сензорен; Хидравличен превключвател за налягане; Задействан с лост; Механично бутало (монтирано на педала); Вакуумен превключвател; Други
ru: Тип срабатывания выключателя стоп-сигнала: Электронный / сенсорный; Гидравлический датчик давления; Рычажный; Механический плунжер (на педали); Вакуумный выключатель; Другое
de: Betätigungstyp für Bremslichtschalter: Elektronisch / sensorbasiert; Hydraulischer Druckschalter; Hebelbetätigt; Mechanischer Stößel (pedalmontiert); Vakuumschalter; Sonstige
sl-SI: Način aktivacije stikala zavornih luči: Elektronsko/senzorsko; Hidravlično tlačno stikalo; Prek ročice; Mehanski bat (nameščen na pedalu); Vakumsko stikalo; Drugo
ja: ブレーキライトスイッチアクションタイプ: 電子式/センサー式; 油圧スイッチ; レバー作動式; 機械式プランジャー (ペダルマウント); 真空スイッチ; その他
th: ประเภทการทำงานของสวิตช์ไฟเบรก: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ / ใช้เซนเซอร์; สวิตช์แรงดันไฮดรอลิก; ทำงานด้วยคันโยก; ลูกสูบกลไก (ยึดติดกับแป้นเหยียบ); สวิตช์สุญญากาศ; อื่นๆ
el: Τύπος ενεργοποίησης διακόπτη φώτων φρένων: Ηλεκτρονικός / με βάση τον αισθητήρα; Υδραυλικός διακόπτης πίεσης; Ενεργοποιούμενος από μοχλό; Μηχανικό έμβολο (τοποθετημένο στο πεντάλ); Διακόπτης κενού; Άλλο
da: Aktiveringstype for bremselyskontakt: Elektronisk/sensorbaseret; Hydraulisk trykafbryder; Aktiveret med håndtag; Mekanisk stempel (pedalmonteret); Vakuumafbryder; Andet
sv: Typ av aktiveringsknapp för bromsljus: Elektronisk / sensorbaserad; Hydraulisk tryckkontakt; Spakaktiverad; Mekanisk kolv (pedalmonterad); Vakuumkontakt; Övrigt
tr: Fren lambası anahtarı tetikleme tipi: Elektronik / sensör bazlı; Hidrolik basınç şalteri; Kol kumandalı; Mekanik pistonlu (pedala monte); Vakum şalteri; Diğer
vi: Kiểu kích hoạt công tắc đèn phanh: Điện tử/dựa trên cảm biến; Công tắc áp suất thủy lực; Điều khiển bằng đòn bẩy; Pít-tông cơ học (gắn trên bàn đạp); Công tắc chân không; Khác
pt-BR: Tipo de acionamento do interruptor da luz de freio: Eletrônico/baseado em sensor; Interruptor de pressão hidráulica; Acionado por alavanca; Êmbolo mecânico (montado no pedal); Interruptor a vácuo; Outro
hu: Féklámpakapcsoló működtetési típusa: Elektronikus / szenzoralapú; Hidraulikus nyomáskapcsoló; Karral működtetett; Mechanikus dugattyús (pedálra szerelt); Vákuumkapcsoló; Egyéb
zh-TW: 煞車燈開關啟動類型: 電子式/感測器式; 液壓壓力開關; 煞車把手觸發; 機械柱塞 (踏板安裝); 真空開關; 其他
zh-CN: 刹车灯开关驱动类型: 电子/基于传感器; 液压开关; 杠杆驱动; 机械柱塞（踏板安装）; 真空开关; 其他
ko: 브레이크등 스위치 작동 방식: 전자식/센서 기반; 유압 압력 스위치; 레버 구동식; 기계식 플런저(페달 장착); 진공 스위치; 기타
lt-LT: Stabdžių žibinto jungiklio paleidimo tipas: Elektroninis / jutiklinis; Hidraulinio slėgio jungiklis; Svirtinis; Mechaninis stūmoklinis (montuojamas prie pedalo); Vakuuminis jungiklis; Kitas
it: Tipo di azionamento dell'interruttore della luce freno: Elettronico / a sensore; Pressostato idraulico; Azionato a leva; Pistoncino meccanico (montato sul pedale); Interruttore a vuoto; Altro
pl: Typ aktywacji przełącznika świateł hamowania: Elektroniczne / oparte na czujnikach; Hydrauliczny wyłącznik ciśnieniowy; Uruchamiane dźwignią; Trzpień mechaniczny (montowany do pedału); Wyłącznik podciśnieniowy; Inne
es: Tipo de activación de interruptores de luces de freno: Electrónico/basado en sensores; Interruptor de presión hidráulica; Accionado por palanca; Émbolo mecánico (montado en el pedal); Interruptor de vacío; Otro
hr-HR: Vrsta pokretanja prekidača za svjetlo kočnice: Elektronički / sa senzorom; Prekidač hidrauličnog tlaka; Pokreće se ručicom; Mehanički klip (montiran na pedalu); Vakuumski prekidač; Ostalo
nb: Aktueringstype for bremselysbryter: Elektronisk / sensorbasert; Hydraulisk trykkbryter; Hendelaktivert; Mekanisk stempel (pedalmontert); Vakuumbryter; Annet
sk-SK: Typ aktivácie spínača brzdového svetla: Elektronická / senzorová; Hydraulický tlakový spínač; Páková; Mechanický piest (na pedáli); Vákuový spínač; Iná